Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-402.03
Consolidation of counties or county or township offices; vote required.

If the consolidation agreement provides for the consolidation of counties or for the consolidation of one or more county or township offices, the county board of each county shall submit the consolidation agreement for approval by the registered voters at the next general election or a special election pursuant to sections 22-404 and 22-405.

Laws 1996, LB 1085, § 14;

Laws 1997, LB 269, § 23.